Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 3. 2008 Large Project Funding [Repealed]

§ 9-15-301.
Lake DeSmet Grasslands. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 53, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-302.
Wyoming Range Aspen Enhancement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 53, § 1 ; 2009, ch. 132, § 2; 2010, ch. 76, § 2; 2011, ch. 87, § 2; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-303.
Diamond H Easement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 53, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-304.
Thunder Basin Grasslands. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 53, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-305.
Carney Ranch Easement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 53, § 1; 2009, ch. 132, § 2; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-306.
North Laramie Range Restoration. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 53, § 1; 2009, ch. 132, § 2; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-307.
Kirby Creek Watershed. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 53, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-308.
Cross Lazy Two Easement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 53, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-309.
Yellowtail CRM II. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 53, § 1 ; 2010, ch. 76, § 2; 2011, ch. 87, § 2; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-310.
Ladder Livestock Easement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 53, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-311.
Shirley Basin Grasslands III. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 53, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.